en: Trivets
xx: Trivets
cs: Trojnožky
da: Bordskånere med ben
de: Topfuntersetzer
es: Apartadores
fr: Dessous de plat
it: Sottopentole
ja: 鍋敷き
nl: Tafelonderzetters
no: Kjeleunderlag
pl: Trójnogi
pt: Tripés
ru: Таганы
sv: Karottunderlägg
tr: Sacayağı

en: Lawn & Garden
xx: Lawn & Garden
cs: Trávníky a zahrady
da: Græsplæne og have
de: Rasen & Garten
es: Jardín
fr: Pelouses et jardins
it: Prato e giardino
ja: ガーデン用品・ガーデン機器
nl: Tuin en gazon
no: Plen og hage
pl: Trawnik i ogród
pt: Gramado e jardim
ru: Товары для газонов и садовых участков
sv: Gräsmatta och trädgård
tr: Çim ve Bahçe

en: Gardening
xx: Gardening
cs: Zahradničení
da: Havearbejde
de: Gartenbau
es: Jardinería
fr: Jardinage
it: Giardinaggio
ja: ガーデニング
nl: Tuinieren
no: Hagestell
pl: Ogrodnictwo
pt: Jardinagem
ru: Товары для садоводства
sv: Trädgårdsskötsel
tr: Bahçecilik

en: Composting
xx: Composting
cs: Kompostování
da: Kompostering
de: Kompostieren
es: Compostaje
fr: Compostage
it: Composting
ja: コンポスト用品
nl: Composteren
no: Kompostering
pl: Kompostowanie
pt: Adubagem
ru: Товары для приготовления компоста
sv: Kompostering
tr: Kompost Hazırlama

en: Compost
xx: Compost
cs: Kompost
da: Kompost
de: Kompost
es: Abono
fr: Compost
it: Compost
ja: コンポスト
nl: Compost
no: Kompost
pl: Kompost
pt: Adubo
ru: Компост
sv: Kompost
tr: Kompost

en: Compost Aerators
xx: Compost Aerators
cs: Provzdušňovače kompostu
da: Kompostluftere
de: Kompostlüfter
es: Aireadores de compost
fr: Aérateurs de compost
it: Ossigenatori per composting
ja: コンポストエアレーター
nl: Compostbeluchters
no: Kompostluftere
pl: Przerzucarki do kompostu
pt: Arejadores de adubo
ru: Аэраторы для компоста
sv: Kompostluftare
tr: Kompost Havalandırma Aletleri

en: Composters
xx: Composters
cs: Kompostéry
da: Kompostbeholdere
de: Komposter
es: Compostadores
fr: Composteurs
it: Compostiere
ja: コンポスター
nl: Composteerders
no: Kompostbeholdere
pl: Kompostowniki
pt: Recipientes de composto
ru: Машины для приготовления компоста
sv: Komposterare
tr: Kompost Hazırlama Makineleri

en: Disease Control
xx: Disease Control
cs: Prevence nákaz
da: Sygdomskontrol
de: Krankheitsbekämpfung
es: Control de enfermedades
fr: Traitement antiparasitaire
it: Controllo malattie
ja: 病害対策
nl: Ziektebestrijding
no: Sykdomskontroll
pl: Ochrona roślin
pt: Controle de Pragas e Doenças
ru: Средства для борьбы с заболеваниями
sv: Sjukdomskontroll
tr: Salgın Önleme

en: Fertilizers
xx: Fertilizers
cs: Hnojiva
da: Gødning
de: Dünger
es: Fertilizantes
fr: Engrais
it: Fertilizzanti
ja: 肥料
nl: Kunstmest
no: Gjødsel
pl: Nawozy
pt: Fertilizantes
ru: Удобрения
sv: Gödningsmedel
tr: Gübre

en: Garden Pot Saucers & Trays
xx: Garden Pot Saucers & Trays
cs: Misky pod květináče
da: Underfade til havekrukker
de: Gartentopfuntersetzer und Trays
es: Platillos y cubetas para macetas
fr: Soucoupes et plateaux pour pots de fleurs
it: Piattini e vassoi per vasi da giardino
ja: 植木鉢用受皿/トレイ
nl: Schalen en onderzetters voor tuinpotten
no: Dreneringfat og -brett for planter
pl: Doniczki i spodki pod donice ogrodowe
pt: Pratos ou bases para vasos
ru: Поддоны для цветочных горшков
sv: Krukfat och brickor
tr: Bahçe Saksısı Tabakları ve Tepsileri

en: Gardening Accessories
xx: Gardening Accessories
cs: Zahradnické doplňky
da: Havearbejde – tilbehør
de: Zubehör für Gartenarbeit
es: Accesorios de jardinería
fr: Accessoires de jardinage, Accessoire de jardin
it: Accessori per il giardinaggio
ja: ガーデニング小物
nl: Tuinieraccessoires
no: Hagetilbehør
pl: Akcesoria ogrodnicze
pt: Acessórios de jardinagem
ru: Принадлежности для садоводства
sv: Tillbehör för trädgårdsskötsel
tr: Bahçecilik Aksesuarları

en: Gardening Scooters\, Seats & Kneelers
xx: Gardening Scooters\, Seats & Kneelers
cs: Zahradnické vozíky\, sedačky a klekací podložky
da: Sæder\, knælepuder og små vogne med sæder til havebrug
de: Rollsitze\, Sitzhilfen & Kniekissen für Gartenarbeit
es: Reclinatorios\, asientos y scooters de jardinería
fr: Sièges roulants\, sièges et repose-genoux pour jardinage
it: Cuscini da lavoro\, sedili e sgabelli con ruote da giardinaggio
ja: ガーデニング用スクーター・椅子
nl: Tuinscooters\, stoeltjes en knielmatjes
no: Kneputer\, krakker og krakker med hjul til hagearbeid
pl: Ogrodowe krzesełka na kółkach i klęczniki
pt: Apoio para joelhos\, assentos e patinetes para jardinagem
ru: Садовые тележки\, скамейки и подставки под колени
sv: Stöd med hjul\, säten och knäskydd för trädgårdsskötsel
tr: Tekerlekli Bahçe Kızağı\, İskemleler ve Diz Destekleri

en: Gardening Totes
xx: Gardening Totes
cs: Přepravky na zahradnické nářadí
da: Havearbejde – tasker
de: Gartentaschen
es: Bolsas de jardinería
fr: Sacs de jardinage
it: Carrelli da giardinaggio
ja: ガーデニングバッグ
nl: Tuiniermandjes
no: Hagevesker
pl: Torby na narzędzia ogrodnicze
pt: Sacolas para ferramentas de jardinagem
ru: Садовые сумки
sv: Trädgårdskorgar
tr: Bahçıvan Çantaları

en: Potting Benches
xx: Potting Benches
cs: Zahradní pracovní stoly
da: Plantebænke
de: Umtopftische
es: Mesas de jardinería
fr: Tables de rempotage
it: Banchi per invasatura
ja: ガーデニング用ベンチ
nl: Oppottafels
no: Plantebord
pl: Stoły do przesadzania roślin
pt: Bancada para jardinagem
ru: Скамейки для горшков
sv: Planteringsbänkar
tr: Saksı Dikim Masaları

en: Gardening Tool Accessories
xx: Gardening Tool Accessories
cs: Příslušenství k zahradnickému náčiní
da: Tilbehør til haveredskaber
de: Zubehör für Gartengeräte
es: Accesorios para herramientas de jardinería
fr: Accessoires pour outils de jardinage
it: Accessori per strumenti da giardinaggio
ja: ガーデニングツール関連用品
nl: Accessoires voor tuingereedschap
no: Tilbehør til hageverktøy
pl: Akcesoria do narzędzi ogrodniczych
pt: Acessórios de ferramentas para jardinagem
ru: Принадлежности для садовых инструментов
sv: Tillbehör till trädgårdsverktyg
tr: Bahçe Aracı Aksesuarları

en: Gardening Tool Handles
xx: Gardening Tool Handles
cs: Držadla k zahradnickému náčiní
da: Skafter til haveredskaber
de: Griffe für Gartengeräte
es: Mangos para herramientas de jardinería
fr: Manches d'outils de jardinage
it: Manici per strumenti da giardinaggio
ja: ガーデニングツール用ハンドル
nl: Stelen voor tuingereedschap
no: Håndtak til hageverktøy
pl: Rączki do narzędzi ogrodniczych
pt: Cabos de ferramentas para jardinagem
ru: Ручки для садовых инструментов
sv: Handtag till trädgårdsverktyg
tr: Bahçe Aracı Sapları

en: Gardening Tool Heads
xx: Gardening Tool Heads
cs: Zahradní nářadí bez násady
da: Hoveder til haveredskaber
de: Aufsätze für Gartengeräte
es: Cabezales de herramientas para jardinería
fr: Têtes d'outils de jardinage
it: Utensili per strumenti da giardinaggio
ja: ガーデニングツール用ヘッド
nl: Montagekoppen voor tuingereedschap
no: Hoder til hageverktøy
pl: Części robocze narzędzi ogrodniczych
pt: Lâminas ou colheres de ferramentas para jardinagem
ru: Насадки для садовых инструментов
sv: Änddelar till trädgårdsverktyg
tr: Bahçe Aracı Kafaları

en: Wheelbarrow Parts
xx: Wheelbarrow Parts
cs: Díly pro zahradní kolečka
da: Trillebør – dele
de: Schubkarrenteile
es: Piezas para carretillas
fr: Pièces pour brouettes
it: Componenti carriole
ja: 手押し車パーツ
nl: Onderdelen voor kruiwagen
no: Trillebårdeler
pl: Części do taczek
pt: Peças para carrinho de mão
ru: Детали для тачки
sv: Delar till skottkärror
tr: El Arabası Parçaları

en: Gardening Tools
xx: Gardening Tools
cs: Zahradnické nářadí
da: Haveredskaber
de: Gartenwerkzeuge
es: Herramientas de jardín
fr: Outils de jardinage, Outil de jardinage
it: Attrezzi da giardinaggio
ja: ガーデニング用具
nl: Tuingereedschap
no: Hageredskaper
pl: Narzędzia ogrodnicze
pt: Ferramentas de jardinagem
ru: Садовые инструменты
sv: Trädgårdsverktyg
tr: Bahçe Aletleri

en: Bulb Planting Tools
xx: Bulb Planting Tools
cs: Kolíky na sázení cibulek
da: Planteredskaber til planteløg
de: Geräte zum Pflanzen von Knollen
es: Herramientas para plantar bulbos
fr: Outils de plantation
it: Strumenti per piantare bulbi
ja: 球根植え器
nl: Bollenplanters
no: Redskaper til løkplanting
pl: Narzędzia do sadzenia cebulek
pt: Ferramentas para plantio de bulbos
ru: Инструменты для посадки луковиц
sv: Lökplanteringsverktyg
tr: Çiçek Ekme Aletleri